dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- ধর্মীয়; ধর্মীয় -->
    <pardef n="ধর্মীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রয়োজনীয়; প্রয়োজনীয় -->
    <pardef n="প্রয়োজনীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অসীম; অসীম -->
    <pardef n="অসীম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রতীক; প্রতীক -->
    <pardef n="প্রতীক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিবাহিত; বিবাহিত -->
    <pardef n="বিবাহিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দুর্ভাগ্যজনক; দুর্ভাগ্যজনক -->
    <pardef n="দুর্ভাগ্যজনক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিবেচিত; বিবেচিত -->
    <pardef n="বিবেচিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিকৃত; বিকৃত -->
    <pardef n="বিকৃত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চোরাই; চোরাই -->
    <pardef n="চোরাই__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অগভীর; অগভীর -->
    <pardef n="অগভীর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পরিচিত; পরিচিত -->
    <pardef n="পরিচিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জীবন্ত; জীবন্ত -->
    <pardef n="জীবন্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কার্যকর; কার্যকর -->
    <pardef n="কার্যকর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উজ্জ্বল; উজ্জ্বল -->
    <pardef n="উজ্জ্বল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রধান; প্রধান -->
    <pardef n="প্রধান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রতীয়মান; প্রতীয়মান -->
    <pardef n="প্রতীয়মান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ভীত; ভীত -->
    <pardef n="ভীত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অবশ্যম্ভাবী; অবশ্যম্ভাবী -->
    <pardef n="অবশ্যম্ভাবী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিয়ন্ত্রিত; নিয়ন্ত্রিত -->
    <pardef n="নিয়ন্ত্রিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আনুষ্ঠানিক; আনুষ্ঠানিক -->
    <pardef n="আনুষ্ঠানিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- রক্তাক্ত; রক্তাক্ত -->
    <pardef n="রক্তাক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিয়মতান্ত্রিক; নিয়মতান্ত্রিক -->
    <pardef n="নিয়মতান্ত্রিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অক্ষম; অক্ষম -->
    <pardef n="অক্ষম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাদা; সাদা -->
    <pardef n="সাদা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আর্থ-সামাজিক; আর্থ-সামাজিক -->
    <pardef n="আর্থ-সামাজিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আপাত; আপাত -->
    <pardef n="আপাত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তৎকালীন; তৎকালীন -->
    <pardef n="তৎকালীন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উর্বর; উর্বর -->
    <pardef n="উর্বর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সম্মত; সম্মত -->
    <pardef n="সম্মত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আনুমানিক; আনুমানিক -->
    <pardef n="আনুমানিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ছোট; ছোট -->
    <pardef n="ছোট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দীর্ঘায়িত; দীর্ঘায়িত -->
    <pardef n="দীর্ঘায়িত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উপেক্ষিত; উপেক্ষিত -->
    <pardef n="উপেক্ষিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্থাপিত; স্থাপিত -->
    <pardef n="স্থাপিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্বাভাবিক; স্বাভাবিক -->
    <pardef n="স্বাভাবিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জঘন্য; জঘন্য -->
    <pardef n="জঘন্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নির্মম; নির্মম -->
    <pardef n="নির্মম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দুর্বল; দুর্বল -->
    <pardef n="দুর্বল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সঠিকতম; সঠিক -->
    <pardef n="সঠিক/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সঠিকতর; সঠিক -->
    <pardef n="সঠিক/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুন্দর; সুন্দর -->
    <pardef n="সুন্দর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিখুঁত; নিখুঁত -->
    <pardef n="নিখুঁত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রান্তিক; প্রান্তিক -->
    <pardef n="প্রান্তিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দুর্গম; দুর্গম -->
    <pardef n="দুর্গম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ধর্মীয়"><i>ধর্মীয়</i><par n="ধর্মীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রয়োজনীয়"><i>প্রয়োজনীয়</i><par n="প্রয়োজনীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অসীম"><i>অসীম</i><par n="অসীম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতীক"><i>প্রতীক</i><par n="প্রতীক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিবাহিত"><i>বিবাহিত</i><par n="বিবাহিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দুর্ভাগ্যজনক"><i>দুর্ভাগ্যজনক</i><par n="দুর্ভাগ্যজনক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিবেচিত"><i>বিবেচিত</i><par n="বিবেচিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিকৃত"><i>বিকৃত</i><par n="বিকৃত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চোরাই"><i>চোরাই</i><par n="চোরাই__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অগভীর"><i>অগভীর</i><par n="অগভীর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিচিত"><i>পরিচিত</i><par n="পরিচিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জীবন্ত"><i>জীবন্ত</i><par n="জীবন্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কার্যকর"><i>কার্যকর</i><par n="কার্যকর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উজ্জ্বল"><i>উজ্জ্বল</i><par n="উজ্জ্বল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রধান"><i>প্রধান</i><par n="প্রধান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতীয়মান"><i>প্রতীয়মান</i><par n="প্রতীয়মান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভীত"><i>ভীত</i><par n="ভীত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অবশ্যম্ভাবী"><i>অবশ্যম্ভাবী</i><par n="অবশ্যম্ভাবী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিয়ন্ত্রিত"><i>নিয়ন্ত্রিত</i><par n="নিয়ন্ত্রিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আনুষ্ঠানিক"><i>আনুষ্ঠানিক</i><par n="আনুষ্ঠানিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="রক্তাক্ত"><i>রক্তাক্ত</i><par n="রক্তাক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিয়মতান্ত্রিক"><i>নিয়মতান্ত্রিক</i><par n="নিয়মতান্ত্রিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অক্ষম"><i>অক্ষম</i><par n="অক্ষম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাদা"><i>সাদা</i><par n="সাদা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আর্থ-সামাজিক"><i>আর্থ-সামাজিক</i><par n="আর্থ-সামাজিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আপাত"><i>আপাত</i><par n="আপাত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তৎকালীন"><i>তৎকালীন</i><par n="তৎকালীন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উর্বর"><i>উর্বর</i><par n="উর্বর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্মত"><i>সম্মত</i><par n="সম্মত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আনুমানিক"><i>আনুমানিক</i><par n="আনুমানিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ছোট"><i>ছোট</i><par n="ছোট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দীর্ঘায়িত"><i>দীর্ঘায়িত</i><par n="দীর্ঘায়িত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উপেক্ষিত"><i>উপেক্ষিত</i><par n="উপেক্ষিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্থাপিত"><i>স্থাপিত</i><par n="স্থাপিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বাভাবিক"><i>স্বাভাবিক</i><par n="স্বাভাবিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জঘন্য"><i>জঘন্য</i><par n="জঘন্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্মম"><i>নির্মম</i><par n="নির্মম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দুর্বল"><i>দুর্বল</i><par n="দুর্বল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সঠিকতম"><i>সঠিক</i><par n="সঠিক/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সঠিকতর"><i>সঠিক</i><par n="সঠিক/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুন্দর"><i>সুন্দর</i><par n="সুন্দর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিখুঁত"><i>নিখুঁত</i><par n="নিখুঁত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রান্তিক"><i>প্রান্তিক</i><par n="প্রান্তিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দুর্গম"><i>দুর্গম</i><par n="দুর্গম__adj"/></e>
